test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-tulwma79_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - tulõma: # Verb (79) tulõma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tulõma+V+Inf/mA: tulõma
     tulõma+V+Inf: tullaq
     tulõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tulõ
     tulõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [tulõt, tulõdõq]
     tulõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tulõ
     tulõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tulõ
     tulõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tulõmiq
     tulõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tulõtiq
     tulõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tulõvaq
     tulõma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegI: tulõq
     tulõma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: tulõ
     tulõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Neg:  [tulõ-õiq, tulõ-õi, tulõ-iq, tulõ-i]
#     ???tulõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuldas
#     ???tulõma+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegI: tuldaq
#     ???tulõma+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegII: tulda
#     ???tulõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Neg: [tulda-aiq, tulda-ai, tulda-iq, tulda-i]
#     ???tulõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Neg: [tulda-as, tulda-s]
     tulõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tulli
     tulõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [tulliq, tullit, tullidõq]
     tulõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tullʼ
     tulõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tullimiq
     tulõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tullitiq
     tulõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tulliq, tullivaq]
     tulõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Neg: [tulõ-õs, tulõ-s]

     tulõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tullõv
     tulõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: tulõva
     tulõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: tulõvat
     tulõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: tulõvahe
     tulõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tulõvaq
     tulõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [tulõvidõ, tulõviidõ]
     tulõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [tulõvit, tulõviid]
     tulõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [tulõvihe, tulõviihe]
                    
     tulõma+V+Act+PrfPrc: tulnuq

     tulõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tulnuq
     tulõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: tulnu 
     tulõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: tulnut
     tulõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: tulnuhe
     tulõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: tulnuq
     tulõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [tulnuidõ, tulnuisi]
     tulõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [tulnuid, tulnuisi]
     tulõma+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [tulnuihe, tulnuisihe]

     tulõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [tult, tultu]
